District of Columbia statutes.
21-1112

Repealed

Public patients may become private patients by filing bond and paying advance.

Repealed.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 770, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 1087, Pub. L. 91-490, § 2(a)(2)
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(e)(7), 59 DCR 5567

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

1973 Ed., § 21-1112.
1981 Ed., § 21-1112.